Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5510
Company training program, defined.

Company training program means any program developed or operated by or for the benefit of the company which screens, trains, or educates recruits, potential employees, or actual employees of the company, or any combination thereof, in order to enable the recruits or employees to perform employment activities at the project and includes recruitment, screening, customized training, job-specific training, on-the-job training, and generalized training programs.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 10.